Montana, session 2025, SB55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Intent. (1) The 2015 state water plan recognizes that improving Montana's water supply
and distribution monitoring network improves the ability of water managers and water users to adjust to
seasonal supply and demand imbalances as well as plan for longer-term imbalances associated with climate
variability.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to support local, state, and federal efforts and programs to
collect and distribute timely and accurate information on Montana streamflows.
(3) The legislature recognizes that streamflow information is collected by numerous state and
federal agencies and tribes to meet their statutory responsibilities.
(4) The legislature recognizes that streamflow information collected by state, tribal, and federal
entities is critical to the administration of the Montana Water Use Act, distribution of water by decree, water
supply planning for municipalities, and implementation of plans and agreements that address irrigation and
agricultural uses and locally developed drought, fish habitat, or water supply objectives.
(5) The legislature recognizes it is in the public interest to support and encourage coordination in
the collection and distribution of streamflow information.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
85, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 85, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 55
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 55, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 55
INTRODUCED BY W. CURDY, B. BEARD, L. BENNETT, M. BERTOGLIO
BY REQUEST OF THE WATER POLICY INTERIM COMMITTEE
AN ACT PROVIDING LEGISLATIVE INTENT REGARDING STREAMFLOW INFORMATION.”